lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1460 Y 21
SFX 1460 is ims . 46
SFX 1460 is im . 47
SFX 1460 is is . 48
SFX 1460 is ius pagonis 142
SFX 1460 is ius palikuonis 142
SFX 1460 is ius pirmuonis 142
SFX 1460 is ius krikščionis 142
SFX 1460 is ius miesčionis 142
SFX 1460 is ius dvarionis 142
SFX 1460 is ius vagis 142
SFX 1460 is ius blėnis 142
SFX 1460 is imis . 49
SFX 1460 is im . 126
SFX 1460 is iais pagonis 49
SFX 1460 is iais palikuonis 49
SFX 1460 is iais pirmuonis 49
SFX 1460 is iais krikščionis 49
SFX 1460 is iais miesčionis 49
SFX 1460 is iais dvarionis 49
SFX 1460 is iais blėnis 49
SFX 1460 is yse . 50

SFX 1481 Y 1
SFX 1481 is ys . 57

SFX 1482 Y 1
SFX 1482 is ysna . 55

SFX 1484 Y 1
SFX 1484 ys iai . 40

SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 ys im . 49

SFX 1495 Y 26
SFX 1495 ys is . 58
SFX 1495 ys ies . 59
SFX 1495 ys io debesys 59
SFX 1495 ys io pagonys 59
SFX 1495 ys io palikuonys 59
SFX 1495 ys io pirmuonys 59
SFX 1495 ys io krikščionys 59
SFX 1495 ys io miesčionys 59
SFX 1495 ys io dvarionys 59
SFX 1495 ys io vagys 59
SFX 1495 ys io žvėrys 59
SFX 1495 ys io blėnys 59
SFX 1495 tys čio dantys 59
SFX 1495 iai is . 58
SFX 1495 iai ys debesiai 58
SFX 1495 iai ies . 59
SFX 1495 iai io debesiai 59
SFX 1495 iai io pagoniai 59
SFX 1495 iai io palikuoniai 59
SFX 1495 iai io pirmuoniai 59
SFX 1495 iai io krikščioniai 59
SFX 1495 iai io miesčioniai 59
SFX 1495 iai io dvarioniai 59
SFX 1495 iai io vagiai 59
SFX 1495 iai io žvėriai 59
SFX 1495 iai io blėniai 59

SFX 1508 Y 36
SFX 1508 ys iui [^t]ys 60
SFX 1508 tys čiui tys 60
SFX 1508 ys į . 61
SFX 1508 ys imi . 62
SFX 1508 ys iu blėnys 62
SFX 1508 ys im . 92
SFX 1508 ys iu debesys 62
SFX 1508 ys iu pagonys 62
SFX 1508 ys iu palikuonys 62
SFX 1508 ys iu pirmuonys 62
SFX 1508 ys iu krikščionys 62
SFX 1508 ys iu miesčionys 62
SFX 1508 ys iu dvarionys 62
SFX 1508 ys iu vagys 62
SFX 1508 ys iu žvėrys 62
SFX 1508 tys čiu dantys 62
SFX 1508 ys yje . 63
SFX 1508 ys yj . 88
SFX 1508 ys y . 88
SFX 1508 iai iui [^t]iai 60
SFX 1508 iai į . 61
SFX 1508 iai imi . 62
SFX 1508 iai iu blėniai 62
SFX 1508 iai im . 92
SFX 1508 iai iu debesiai 62
SFX 1508 iai iu pagoniai 62
SFX 1508 iai iu palikuoniai 62
SFX 1508 iai iu pirmuoniai 62
SFX 1508 iai iu krikščioniai 62
SFX 1508 iai iu miesčioniai 62
SFX 1508 iai iu dvarioniai 62
SFX 1508 iai iu vagiai 62
SFX 1508 iai iu žvėriai 62
SFX 1508 iai yje . 63
SFX 1508 iai yj . 88
SFX 1508 iai y . 88

SFX 1527 Y 14
SFX 1527 ys ie . 64
SFX 1527 ys i pagonys 64
SFX 1527 ys i palikuonys 64
SFX 1527 ys i krikščionys 64
SFX 1527 ys i miesčionys 64
SFX 1527 ys i dvarionys 64
SFX 1527 ys i blėnys 64
SFX 1527 iai ie . 64
SFX 1527 iai i pagoniai 64
SFX 1527 iai i palikuoniai 64
SFX 1527 iai i krikščioniai 64
SFX 1527 iai i miesčioniai 64
SFX 1527 iai i dvarioniai 64
SFX 1527 iai i blėniai 64

SFX 1534 Y 2
SFX 1534 ys in . 66
SFX 1534 iai in . 66

SFX 1535 Y 3
SFX 1535 ys iu [^t]ys 67
SFX 1535 tys čiu tys 67
SFX 1535 iai iu [^t]iai 67

SFX 1576 Y 6
SFX 1576 is is . 68
SFX 1576 is ies . 69
SFX 1576 is io palikuonis 69
SFX 1576 is io vagis 69
SFX 1576 ys ys . 70
SFX 1576 ys ių . 71

SFX 1580 Y 16
SFX 1580 is iui [^t]is 72
SFX 1580 tis čiui tis 72
SFX 1580 is į . 73
SFX 1580 is imi . 74
SFX 1580 is im . 93
SFX 1580 is iu palikuonis 132
SFX 1580 is iu vagis 132
SFX 1580 is yje . 75
SFX 1580 is yj . 89
SFX 1580 is y . 89
SFX 1580 ys ims . 76
SFX 1580 ys im . 77
SFX 1580 ys is . 78
SFX 1580 ys imis . 79
SFX 1580 ys im . 127
SFX 1580 ys yse . 80

SFX 1590 Y 3
SFX 1590 is ie . 82
SFX 1590 is i palikuonis 82
SFX 1590 ys ys . 83

SFX 1592 Y 2
SFX 1592 is in . 84
SFX 1592 ys ysna . 85

SFX 1593 Y 2
SFX 1593 is iu [^t]is 86
SFX 1593 tis čiu tis 86

SFX 1595 Y 4
SFX 1595 is ys . 70
SFX 1595 is iai palikuonis 70
SFX 1595 is ių [^t]is 71
SFX 1595 is ų tis 71

SFX 1599 Y 9
SFX 1599 is ims . 76
SFX 1599 is im . 77
SFX 1599 is is . 78
SFX 1599 is ius palikuonis 143
SFX 1599 is ius vagis 143
SFX 1599 is imis . 79
SFX 1599 is im . 127
SFX 1599 is iais palikuonis 79
SFX 1599 is yse . 80

SFX 1608 Y 1
SFX 1608 is ys . 83

SFX 1609 Y 1
SFX 1609 is ysna . 85

SFX 1611 Y 1
SFX 1611 ys iai . 70

SFX 1618 Y 1
SFX 1618 ys im . 79

SFX 1622 Y 4
SFX 1622 ys is . 128
SFX 1622 ys ies . 129
SFX 1622 ys io palikuonys 129
SFX 1622 ys io vagys 129

SFX 1626 Y 10
SFX 1626 ys iui [^t]ys 130
SFX 1626 tys čiui tys 130
SFX 1626 ys į . 131
SFX 1626 ys imi . 132
SFX 1626 ys im . 144
SFX 1626 ys iu palikuonys 132
SFX 1626 ys iu vagys 132
SFX 1626 ys yje . 133
SFX 1626 ys yj . 134
SFX 1626 ys y . 134

SFX 1636 Y 2
SFX 1636 ys ie . 135
SFX 1636 ys i palikuonys 135

SFX 1638 Y 1
SFX 1638 ys in . 136

SFX 1639 Y 2
SFX 1639 ys iu [^t]ys 137
SFX 1639 tys čiu tys 137

SFX 1641 Y 11
SFX 1641 uo uo . 38
SFX 1641 uo ens . 39
SFX 1641 uo enio akmuo 39
SFX 1641 uo enio ruduo 39
SFX 1641 uo enio vanduo 39
SFX 1641 uo enio piemuo 39
SFX 1641 uo enio ašmuo 39
SFX 1641 uo enio dubuo 39
SFX 1641 uo enies ašmuo 39
SFX 1641 ys ys . 40
SFX 1641 ys ų . 41

SFX 1650 Y 14
SFX 1650 uo eniui . 42
SFX 1650 uo enį . 43
SFX 1650 uo eniu . 44
SFX 1650 uo enimi . 62
SFX 1650 uo enim . 92
SFX 1650 uo enyje . 45
SFX 1650 uo enyj . 87
SFX 1650 uo eny . 87
SFX 1650 ys ims . 46
SFX 1650 ys im . 47
SFX 1650 ys is . 48
SFX 1650 ys imis . 49
SFX 1650 ys im . 50
SFX 1650 ys yse . 51

SFX 1658 Y 2
SFX 1658 uo enie . 52
SFX 1658 ys ys . 57

SFX 1659 Y 2
SFX 1659 uo enin . 54
SFX 1659 ys ysna . 55

SFX 1660 Y 1
SFX 1660 uo eniu . 56

SFX 1661 Y 2
SFX 1661 uo enys . 40
SFX 1661 uo enų . 41

SFX 1663 Y 6
SFX 1663 uo enims . 46
SFX 1663 uo enim . 47
SFX 1663 uo enis . 48
SFX 1663 uo enimis . 49
SFX 1663 uo enim . 126
SFX 1663 uo enyse . 50

SFX 1669 Y 1
SFX 1669 uo enys . 57

SFX 1670 Y 1
SFX 1670 uo enysna . 55

SFX 1681 Y 9
SFX 1681 enys uo . 58
SFX 1681 enys ens . 59
SFX 1681 enys enio akmenys 59
SFX 1681 enys enio rudenys 59
SFX 1681 enys enio vandenys 59
SFX 1681 enys enio piemenys 59
SFX 1681 enys enio ašmenys 59
SFX 1681 enys enio dubenys 59
SFX 1681 enys enies ašmenys 59

SFX 1690 Y 8
SFX 1690 enys eniui . 60
SFX 1690 enys enį . 61
SFX 1690 enys eniu . 62
SFX 1690 enys enimi . 62
SFX 1690 enys enim . 92
SFX 1690 enys enyje . 63
SFX 1690 enys enyj . 88
SFX 1690 enys eny . 88

SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 enys enie . 64

SFX 1699 Y 1
SFX 1699 enys enin . 66

SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 enys eniu . 67

SFX 1701 Y 5
SFX 1701 uo uo . 38
SFX 1701 uo uva . 58
SFX 1701 uo uns . 39
SFX 1701 uo unio . 39
SFX 1701 uo unies . 39

SFX 1706 Y 6
SFX 1706 uo uniui . 42
SFX 1706 uo unį . 43
SFX 1706 uo unimi . 44
SFX 1706 uo unim . 91
SFX 1706 uo uniu . 44
SFX 1706 uo unyje . 45

SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 uo unie . 52

SFX 1713 Y 1
SFX 1713 uo unin . 54

SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 uo uniu . 56

SFX 1715 Y 3
SFX 1715 uo unys . 40
SFX 1715 uo unes . 141
SFX 1715 uo unų . 41

SFX 1718 Y 6
SFX 1718 uo unims . 46
SFX 1718 uo unim . 47
SFX 1718 uo unis . 48
SFX 1718 uo unimis . 49
SFX 1718 uo unim . 126
SFX 1718 uo unyse . 50

SFX 1724 Y 1
SFX 1724 uo unys . 57

SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 uo unysna . 55

SFX 1726 Y 2
SFX 1726 uo uo . 38
SFX 1726 uo uonies . 39

SFX 1728 Y 6
SFX 1728 uo uoniui . 42
SFX 1728 uo uonį . 43
SFX 1728 uo uonimi . 44
SFX 1728 uo uonim . 91
SFX 1728 uo uoniu . 44
SFX 1728 uo uonyje . 45

SFX 1734 Y 1
SFX 1734 uo uonie . 52

SFX 1735 Y 1
SFX 1735 uo uonin . 54

SFX 1736 Y 1
SFX 1736 uo uoniu . 56

SFX 1737 Y 2
SFX 1737 uo uonys . 40
SFX 1737 uo uonių . 41

SFX 1739 Y 6
SFX 1739 uo uonims . 46
SFX 1739 uo uonim . 47
SFX 1739 uo uonis . 48
SFX 1739 uo uonimis . 49
SFX 1739 uo uonim . 126
SFX 1739 uo uonyse . 50

SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 uo uonys . 57

SFX 1746 Y 1
SFX 1746 uo uonysna . 55

SFX 1747 Y 4
SFX 1747 uo uo . 94
SFX 1747 uo ers . 95
SFX 1747 uo erys . 96
SFX 1747 uo erų . 97

SFX 1749 Y 13
SFX 1749 uo eriai . 98
SFX 1749 uo erį . 99
SFX 1749 uo erimi . 100
SFX 1749 uo eria . 100
SFX 1749 uo erim . 138
SFX 1749 uo eryje . 101
SFX 1749 uo ery . 102
SFX 1749 uo erims . 103
SFX 1749 uo erim . 104
SFX 1749 uo eris . 105
SFX 1749 uo erimis . 106
SFX 1749 uo erim . 107
SFX 1749 uo eryse . 108

AF 1641,1650,1658,1659,1661,1663,1669,1670,30001 # 95
AF 1401,1415,1416,1432,1436,1443,1447,1460,1481,30001 # 99
AF 1641,1650,1658,1659,1661,1663,1669,1670,1681,1690,1698,1699,30001 # 260
AF 1401,1416,1436,1444,1447,1460,1481,1482,1484,1491,30001 # 292
AF 1401,1415,1416,1432,1447,1460,30001 # 295
AF 1401,1416,1436,1444,1445,1447,1460,1481,1482,1484,1491,30001 # 304
AF 1401,1416,1436,1444,1484,1491,30001 # 305
AF 1641,1650,1658,30001 # 317
AF 1641,1650,1658,1661,1663,1669,30001 # 325
AF 1401,1416,1436,1444,1447,1460,1481,1482,1484,1491,1495,1508,1527,1534,30001 # 328
AF 1576,1580,1590,1592,1595,1599,1608,1609,1611,1618,30001 # 349
AF 1401,1415,1416,1432,1436,1443,1444,1447,1460,1481,1482,30001 # 378
AF 1641,1650,1658,1659,30001 # 489
AF 1747,1749,1756,1757,1758,30001 # 493
AF 1701,1706,1712,1713,1714,1715,1718,1724,1725,30001 # 526
