lt_LT.dic
Arciškonys/99	7
armuo/95	5
asmuo/95	5
atitikmuo/95	5
audmenys/95	5
aumuo/95	5
Avižonys/99	7
ašmenys/260	5
baigmuo/95	5
Bačkonys/99	7
Bezdonys/99	7
blėnis/292	5
Burbonys/99	7
Butvydonys/99	7
Dabšionys/99	7
dantis/292	5
Daugidonys/99	7
Davalgonys/295	7
debesis/304	5
deguonis/305	5
Doškonys/99	7
Dratvuo/317	7
dubuo/95	5
duomuo/95	5
Dusmenys/325	7
dvarionys/328	5
Dvaronys/99	7
dėmuo/95	5
Eitekonys/99	7
gelmenys/95	5
geluonis/292	5
geoduomenys/95	5
Geranainys/99	7
Gikonys/295	7
Griškonys/99	7
grobuonis/349	5
Guronys/295	7
Jagelonys/99	7
Janionys/99	7
Jovaišonys/99	7
Jočionys/99	7
Juodonys/99	7
juosmuo/95	5
Kackonys/99	7
kaitmuo/95	5
Kaišiadorys/378	7
Kazionys/99	7
Keižonys/99	7
Kiemionys/99	7
Kretuonys/99	7
krikščionis/292	5
Krivonys/99	7
kryžmuo/95	5
Kudonys/295	7
Lenkmuo/317	7
liemuo/95	5
Lieponys/99	7
Linkmenys/325	7
lygmuo/95	5
makrolygmuo/95	5
Margionys/99	7
matmuo/95	5
Meironys/99	7
Melekonys/99	7
Merkmenys/325	7
metaduomuo/95	5
metalygmuo/95	5
metmuo/95	5
miesčionis/292	5
Miknonys/99	7
mikroduomenys/95	5
mikrolygmuo/95	5
momuo/95	5
Mėčionys/99	7
nekrikščionis/292	5
nešmuo/95	5
Nikronys/295	7
Odmuo/317	7
omuo/95	5
Ožionys/99	7
pagonis/292	5
palikuonis/292	5
palikuonis/349	5
Paškonys/295	7
piemuo/95	5
Pienionys/99	7
pirmuonis/292	5
platmuo/95	5
plaukmuo/95	5
Pocelonys/99	7
Poškonys/99	7
pradmuo/95	5
puošmuo/95	5
Randamonys/99	7
raumuo/95	5
rašmuo/95	5
reikmuo/95	5
riedmuo/95	5
Riovonys/99	7
rodmuo/95	5
ruduo/95	5
rėmuo/489	5
Sekionys/99	7
sekmuo/95	5
sesuo/493	5
skaitmuo/95	5
skersmuo/95	5
Skiemonys/99	7
skiemuo/95	5
sodmuo/95	5
Sokonys/99	7
spaudmuo/95	5
sprogmuo/95	5
staigmuo/95	5
statmuo/95	5
stormuo/95	5
stuomuo/95	5
svarmuo/95	5
sėdmuo/95	5
sėmenys/95	5
taikmuo/95	5
Tarakonys/99	7
tešmuo/95	5
Tribonys/99	7
vagis/292	5
vagis/349	5
vaidmuo/95	5
vanduo/95	5
Vangelonys/99	7
vedmuo/95	5
Vikonys/99	7
Vėžionys/99	7
Čekonys/99	7
Švitinys/99	7
Žiežmuo/317	7
Žiupronys/295	7
ėduonis/292	5
šaudmuo/95	5
šelmuo/95	5
šuo/526	5
želmuo/95	5
žiniuonis/292	5
žiomuo/95	5
žvėris/292	5
žymuo/95	5
